tables/hu-hu-g2.ctb
#General, need abbreviate end of llal suffix part, but the vállal word have some exceptions, depending the text context.
#Following context rules gracefully handle this different situations
noback context ["vállal"]$s"ige\s" @1236-4-123-123-1-123
noback context "ciát"$s["vállal"] @1236-4-123-123-1-123	For example the "garanciát vállal" context not need abbreviate the end of llal suffix
noback context "séget"$s["vállal"] @1236-4-123-123-1-123	For example felelősséget vállal context not need abbreviate the end of llal word suffix
noback context ["kockázatot\svállal"] @13-135-14-13-4-126-1-2345-135-2345-0-1236-4-123-123-1-123	This text part doesn't need abbreviate the llal suffix with end of vállal word, and the kockázatot text part need presenting with contracted word
noback context ["vállal"]$s"el" @1236-4-123-123-1-123
noback context ["vállal"]$s"felelősséget" @1236-4-123-123-1-123
noback context $l["em\svállal"] @0-1236-4-123-123-1-123	The "Nem vállal" and "nem vállal" text parts doesn't need abbreviate the end of llal suffix, only the nem and Nem word part
noback context $l["észt\svállal"] @16-156-2345-0-1236-4-123-123-1-123
noback context "ligha"$s["vállal"] @1236-4-123-123-1-123
noback context ["vállal"]$s"állás" @1236-4-123-123-1-123
noback context ["vállal"]$s"munkát" @1236-4-123-123-1-123
noback context ["vállal"]$s$s"fogcsonk" @1236-4-123-123-1-123
noback context ["vállal"]$s"fogcsonk" @1236-4-123-123-1-123
noback context ["vállal"]$s"kezes" @1236-4-123-123-1-123
noback context ["vállal"]$s"magára" @1236-4-123-123-1-123
always átvállal 4-2345-1236-4-123-123-1-123
always bevállal 12-15-1236-4-123-123-1-123
always elvállal 15-123-1236-4-123-123-1-123
noback context ["\f,"] @2
noback context $l["+"]$s$l @0-1234-123-136-156	If a word ends with a + simbol and follow up a next word after a space character, need replacing the + punctuation character with the "plusz" text

#names related context rules, when not need abbreviate a general abbreviated word part
noback context $U["oldog"]$s$U$a @135-123-145-135-1245	For example Boldog Gizella name not need abbreviate the boldog word part with 12-1245 dots
noback context $U["oldog"]$l1-30$s$U$a @135-123-145-135-1245	For example Boldogfalvi Tamás name not need abbreviate the boldog word part with 12-1245 dots
noback context $U$l1-30$s["de"]$s$U$a @145-15	General, need abbrewiate the de word with 1545 dots, but hungarian literary texts some spanish or portuguese names need replacing the abbreviated de word with normal 145-15 dots. For example: Rio de Janeiro, 
noback context $U["ond"]$l1-30$s$U$a @135-1345-145	General need abbreviate the gond word part with 1245-145 dots, but in names, this is not need. For example: Gonda János, Gondos Réka.
noback context [%nagysz"zabad"]$s$U$a @156-1-12-1-145
noback context [%nagysz"zabad"]$l1-30$s$U$a @156-1-12-1-145
always ponta-kormá 1234-135-1345-2345-1-36-13-135-1235-134-4

noback context [", "] @2
noback context $U["emmel"]$s$U$a @15-134-134-15-123	For example Temmel Anikó, Temmel Márta names not need apply the suffix abbreviation
noback context $U["an"]$s$U"ogh" @1-1345

#Some pass2 step related rules
noback pass2 @135-1235-156-4-1245-1456 @135-1245-1456
noback pass2 @1234-16-1345-126 @1234-126
noback pass2 @13-15-1235-15-234-16-234-234-15-123 @13-234-16-234-1236
noback pass2 @13-15-1235-15-234-16-234 @13-234-16-234
noback pass2 @12345-156-156-15-13 @12345-15-13
noback pass2 @124-135-1235-1235-4-234 @1235-1235-4-234
noback pass2 @145-16-123-136-2345-4-1345 @145-16-123-136
noback pass2 @1236-24-123-4-1245 @1236-1245
space \xe000 46a
noback pass2 @1236-1-13-135-13$s$s.@1236-24-123-4-1245 @1236-1-13-135-13-0-1236-24-123-4-1245
endnum ä 5-1
prepunc ä 5-1
postpunc ä 5-1
always ä 5-1
noback context $l$p["–"] @36-36
noback context $l["–"] @36-36
noback always \\_ 6 letter sign before Roman page numbers
noback pass2 @3456-356 @356-3456
include hu-hu-g1_braille_input.cti
undefined 26
